Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4028.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin MODIFICATION TO RULES REGARDING CONSTRUCTION OF STORM SHELTERS REQUIRED.new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner of labor and industry must amend Minnesota Rules, part 1305.0423, to exclude Group E schools from the requirement to construct storm shelters. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner may use the good cause exemption under Minnesota Statutes, section 14.388, subdivision 1, clause (3), to adopt rules under this section and Minnesota Statutes, section 14.386, does not apply except as provided under Minnesota Statutes, section 14.388. new text end